Washington statutes.
RCW 2.72.055

Decision-making authority training—Legal community and persons working in long-term care facilities.

The *office of public guardianship, in partnership with the office of the state long-term care ombuds, must develop and offer training targeted to the legal community and persons working in long-term care facilities regarding the different kinds of decision-making authority, including guardianship, authority granted under power of attorney, and surrogate health care decision-making authority. The training must include, at a minimum, information regarding: The roles, duties, and responsibilities of different kinds of decision makers; the scope of authority and limitations on authority with respect to different kinds of decision makers; and any relevant remedial measures provided in law for activity that exceeds the scope of decision-making authority.

[ 2017 c 268 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "office of public guardianship" was renamed the "office of public guardianship and conservatorship" by 2020 c 312 s 403, effective January 1, 2022.